District of Columbia statutes.
1-306.34

Required housing where existing housing is removed.

If the additional commercial office space is located on a development site that is improved with 1 or more housing units that are removed, either after the application or within 1 year prior to the application to facilitate the commercial development, the total square footage of the required affordable housing shall be not less than the total square footage of the removed housing plus the square footage of housing required by § 1-306.33(2).

Apr. 10, 1984, D.C. Law 5-76, § 3, 31 DCR 1049
Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-275, § 2(a), 41 DCR 1498
This section is referenced in § 1-306.33.